Hawaii statutes.
[§231-4.3] Investigators; appointment and
powers. The director may appoint and commission one or more investigators
as the exigencies of the public service may require. Persons appointed and
commissioned under this section shall have and may exercise all of the powers
and authority and the benefits and privileges of a police officer or of a
deputy sheriff, including the power to arrest; provided that such powers shall
remain in force and effect only while in actual performance of their duties.
These investigators shall consist of personnel whose primary duty is to conduct
investigations as directed by the director. Persons appointed and commissioned
under this section shall be exempt from chapter 76. [L 2003, c 136, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next